Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB379.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.001 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Administrator" means the chief executive officer of the institution;
(2) "Adult basic education" means instruction in mathematics, science, social studies, reading, language arts, and
related areas to enable individuals to better function in society;
(3) "Benchmarks" means objective measures developed where applicable or practical by the Council on
Postsecondary Education to judge the performance of the postsecondary education system and progress toward
the goals of postsecondary education in the Commonwealth[as stated in KRS 164.003(2)];
(4) "Board" or "governing board" means the board of trustees for the University of Kentucky or the University of
Louisville, the board of regents for a comprehensive university, or the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(5) "Board of regents" means the governing board of each comprehensive university and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(6) ["Committee" means the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education created in KRS 164.004;
(7) ]"Comprehensive university" means the following public institutions: Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky
State University, Morehead State University, Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, and
Western Kentucky University;
(7)[(8)] "Council" means the Council on Postsecondary Education created in KRS 164.011;
(8)[(9)] "Customized training" means training in specific academic areas, work processes, or technical skills
that are designed to serve a specific industry or industries to upgrade worker skills;
(9)[(10) "Goals" means the six (6) goals specified in KRS 164.003(2);
(11)] "Independent institution" means a nonpublic postsecondary education institution in Kentucky whose
instruction is not solely sectarian in nature, is accredited by a regional accrediting association recognized by
the United States Department of Education, and is licensed by the Council on Postsecondary Education;
(10)[(12)] "Institution" means a university, college, community college, health technology center, vocational-
technical school, technical institute, technical college, technology center, or the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System;
(11)[(13)] "Kentucky Community and Technical College System" means the system composed of public
community and technical colleges, including those postsecondary institutions operated by the former Cabinet
for Workforce Development and those community colleges in the University of Kentucky Community College
System on May 30, 1997.
The system also includes institutions created by the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System and approved by the General Assembly;
(12)[(14)] "Literacy" means an individual's ability to read, write, and speak in English and compute and solve
problems at levels of proficiency necessary to function on the job and in society to achieve one's goals and
develop one's knowledge and potential;
(13)[(15)] "Lower division academic course" means any academic course offered for college or university credit
that is designated as a freshman or sophomore level academic course;
(14)[(16)] "Nonteaching personnel" means any employee who is a full-time staff member, excluding a president,
chancellor, vice president, academic dean, academic department chair, or administrator;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(15)[(17)] "Postsecondary education system" means the following public institutions: University of Kentucky,
University of Louisville, Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University,
Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, Western Kentucky University, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System;
(16)[(18) "P-16 council" or "council of partners" means a local or state council that is composed of educators
from public and private preschools, elementary, secondary, and postsecondary education institutions, local
board of education members, and may include community and business representatives that have voluntarily
organized themselves for the purpose of improving the alignment and quality of the education continuum from
preschool through postsecondary education as well as student achievement at all levels;
(19)] "Public" means operated with state support;
(17)[(20)] "Relative" means a person's father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son, daughter, aunt, uncle,
son-in-law, or daughter-in-law;
(18)[(21) "Remedial education" means any program, course, or activity that is designed specifically for students
who have basic deficiencies in reading, written or oral communication, mathematics, study skills, or other
skills necessary to do beginning postsecondary work as defined by the institution;
(22)] "Standardized degree program" means a program, approved by the Council on Postsecondary Education, that
consists of specific competencies, curriculum, and performance requirements regardless of the providing
institution;
(19)[(23)] "Strategic agenda" means the state strategic postsecondary education agenda described in KRS
164.0203;
(20)[(24)] "Technical institution" means an educational institution that offers certificates, diplomas, or technical
degrees in technical or occupational-related programs, including a facility called a vocational-technical school,
technical institute, health technology center, technology center, technical college, or similar designation; and
(21)[(25)] "Learning outcomes" means the knowledge, skills, and abilities that students have attained as a result of
their involvement in a particular set of educational experiences.
Section 2. KRS 164.013 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall set the qualifications for the position of president of the
council. [Except for the first president appointed under subsection (2) of this section, ]The council may employ
a search firm and conduct a nationwide search for candidates. Any search firm employed by the council shall
consider, interview, and propose three (3) or more candidates for the position of president. The council may
seek additional names from the search firm or from other sources.
(2) [In the selection of candidates for the first president of the Council on Postsecondary Education, the Strategic
Committee on Postsecondary Education shall serve as a search committee, employing a search firm for
assistance. The committee shall recommend three (3) candidates to be considered by the council and shall
repeat this process until it finds a satisfactory person to appoint as the first president of the council.
(3) ]The president shall possess an excellent academic and administrative background, have strong
communication skills, have significant experience and an established reputation as a professional in the field of
postsecondary education, and shall not express, demonstrate, or appear to have an institutional or regional bias
in his or her actions.
(3)[(4)] The president shall be the primary advocate for postsecondary education and advisor to the Governor
and the General Assembly on matters of postsecondary education in Kentucky. As the primary advocate for
postsecondary education, the president shall work closely with the [committee and the ]elected leadership of
the Commonwealth to ensure that they are fully informed about postsecondary education issues and that the
council fully understands the goals for postsecondary education in the Commonwealth[that the General
Assembly has established in KRS 164.003(2)].
(4)[(5)] The president may design and develop for review by the council new statewide initiatives in accordance
with the strategic agenda.
(5)[(6)] (a) The council shall set the salary of the president at an amount no greater than the salary the
president was receiving on January 1, 2012.
(b) The salary of the president shall be exempt from state employee salary limitations as set forth in KRS
64.640.

CHAPTER 171 3
(6)[(7)] The president shall be accorded a contract to serve for a term not to exceed five (5) years, which is
renewable at the pleasure of the council.
(7)[(8)] The president shall determine the staffing positions and organizational structure necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of the council and may employ staff. All personnel positions of the Council on Higher
Education, as of May 30, 1997, with the exception of the position of executive director, shall be transferred to
the Council on Postsecondary Education. All personnel shall be transferred at the same salary and benefit
levels. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 11A.040, any person employed by the Council on Higher
Education prior to May 30, 1997, may accept immediate employment with any governmental entity or any
postsecondary education organization or institution in the Commonwealth and may carry out the employment
duties assigned by that entity, organization, or institution.
(8)[(9)] The president shall be responsible for the day-to-day operations of the council and shall report and
submit annual reports on the strategic implementation plan of the strategic agenda, carry out policy and
program directives of the council, prepare and submit to the council for its approval the proposed budget of the
council, and perform all other duties and responsibilities assigned by state law.
(9)[(10)] With approval of the council, the president may enter into agreements with any state agency or political
subdivision of the state, any state postsecondary education institution, or any other person or entity to enlist
staff assistance to implement the duties and responsibilities under KRS 164.020.
(10)[(11)] The president shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of
all assigned duties and responsibilities.
Section 3. KRS 164.020 is amended to read as follows:
The Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky shall:
(1) Develop and implement the strategic agenda[ with the advice and counsel of the Strategic Committee on
Postsecondary Education]. The council shall provide for and direct the planning process and subsequent
strategic implementation plans based on the strategic agenda as provided in KRS 164.0203;
(2) Revise the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan[ with the advice and counsel of the committee
as set forth in KRS 164.004];
(3) Develop a system of public accountability related to the strategic agenda by evaluating the performance and
effectiveness of the state's postsecondary system. The council shall prepare a report in conjunction with the
accountability reporting described in KRS 164.095, which shall be submitted to [the committee, ]the
Governor[,] and the General Assembly by December 1 annually. This report shall include a description of
contributions by postsecondary institutions to the quality of elementary and secondary education in the
Commonwealth;
(4) Review, revise, and approve the missions of the state's universities and the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall have the final authority to
determine the compliance of postsecondary institutions with their academic, service, and research missions;
(5) Establish and ensure that all postsecondary institutions in Kentucky cooperatively provide for an integrated
system of postsecondary education. The council shall guard against inappropriate and unnecessary conflict and
duplication by promoting transferability of credits and easy access of information among institutions;
(6) Engage in analyses and research to determine the overall needs of postsecondary education and adult
education in the Commonwealth;
(7) Develop plans that may be required by federal legislation. The council shall for all purposes of federal
legislation relating to planning be considered the "single state agency" as that term may be used in federal
legislation. When federal legislation requires additional representation on any "single state agency," the
Council on Postsecondary Education shall establish advisory groups necessary to satisfy federal legislative or
regulatory guidelines;
(8) (a) Determine tuition and approve the minimum qualifications for admission to the state postsecondary
educational system. In defining residency, the council shall classify a student as having Kentucky
residency if the student met the residency requirements at the beginning of his or her last year in high
school and enters a Kentucky postsecondary education institution within two (2) years of high school
graduation. In determining the tuition for non-Kentucky residents, the council shall consider the fees
required of Kentucky students by institutions in adjoining states, the resident fees charged by other
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
states, the total actual per student cost of training in the institutions for which the fees are being
determined, and the ratios of Kentucky students to non-Kentucky students comprising the enrollments
of the respective institutions, and other factors the council may in its sole discretion deem pertinent,
except that the Kentucky Community and Technical College System may assess a mandatory student
fee not to exceed eight dollars ($8) per credit hour to be used exclusively for debt service on amounts
not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the total projects cost of the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System agency bond projects included in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 117, Part II, J., 11.
(b) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System mandatory fee established in this subsection
shall only be used for debt service on agency bond projects.
(c) Any fee established as provided by this subsection shall cease to be assessed upon the retirement of the
project bonds for which it services debt.
(d) Prior to the issuance of any bonds, the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
certify in writing to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet that sufficient funds have
been raised to meet the local match equivalent to twenty-five percent (25%) of the total project cost;
(9) Devise, establish, and periodically review and revise policies to be used in making recommendations to the
Governor for consideration in developing recommendations to the General Assembly for appropriations to the
universities, the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and to support strategies for persons to
maintain necessary levels of literacy throughout their lifetimes. The council has sole discretion, with advice of
the [Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education and the ]executive officers of the postsecondary
education system, to devise policies that provide for allocation of funds among the universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System;
(10) Lead and provide staff support for the biennial budget process as provided under KRS Chapter 48[, in
cooperation with the committee];
(11) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, review and approve all capital construction
projects covered by KRS 45.750(1)(f), including real property acquisitions, and regardless of the source
of funding for projects or acquisitions. Approval of capital projects and real property acquisitions shall
be on a basis consistent with the strategic agenda and the mission of the respective universities and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System.
(b) The organized groups that are establishing community college satellites as branches of existing
community colleges in the counties of Laurel, Leslie, and Muhlenberg, and that have substantially
obtained cash, pledges, real property, or other commitments to build the satellite at no cost to the
Commonwealth, other than operating costs that shall be paid as part of the operating budget of the main
community college of which the satellite is a branch, are authorized to begin construction of the satellite
on or after January 1, 1998;
(12) Require reports from the executive officer of each institution it deems necessary for the effectual performance
of its duties;
(13) Ensure that the state postsecondary system does not unnecessarily duplicate services and programs provided
by private postsecondary institutions and shall promote maximum cooperation between the state postsecondary
system and private postsecondary institutions. Receive and consider an annual report prepared by the
Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities stating the condition of independent
institutions, listing opportunities for more collaboration between the state and independent institutions and
other information as appropriate;
(14) Establish course credit, transfer, and degree components as required in KRS 164.2951;
(15) (a) Define and approve the offering of all postsecondary education technical, associate, baccalaureate,
graduate, and professional degree, certificate, or diploma programs in the public postsecondary
education institutions. The council shall not approve a new degree, certificate, or diploma program that
includes a requirement for a course or training of which the primary purpose is to indoctrinate
participants with a discriminatory concept.
(b) The council shall expedite wherever possible the approval of requests from the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System board of regents relating to new certificate, diploma, technical, or
associate degree programs of a vocational-technical and occupational nature. Without the consent of the
General Assembly, the council shall not abolish or limit the total enrollment of the general program
offered at any community college to meet the goal of reasonable access throughout the Commonwealth

CHAPTER 171 5
to a two (2) year course of general studies designed for transfer to a baccalaureate program. This does
not restrict or limit the authority of the council, as set forth in this section, to eliminate or make changes
in individual programs within that general program;
(16) Eliminate, in its discretion, existing programs or make any changes in existing academic programs at the
state's postsecondary educational institutions, taking into consideration these criteria:
(a) Consistency with the institution's mission and the strategic agenda;
(b) Alignment with the priorities in the strategic implementation plan for achieving the strategic agenda;
(c) Elimination of unnecessary duplication of programs within and among institutions;
(d) Efforts to create cooperative programs with other institutions through traditional means, or by use of
distance learning technology and electronic resources, to achieve effective and efficient program
delivery; and
(e) Alignment with KRS 164.2895, including the elimination of any program that includes a requirement
for a course or training of which the primary purpose is to indoctrinate participants with a
discriminatory concept;
(17) Ensure the governing board and faculty of all postsecondary education institutions are committed to providing
instruction free of discrimination against students who hold political views and opinions contrary to those of
the governing board and faculty;
(18) Review proposals and make recommendations to the Governor regarding the establishment of new public
community colleges, technical institutions, and new four (4) year colleges;
(19) Ensure the coordination, transferability, and connectivity of technology among postsecondary institutions in
the Commonwealth including the development and implementation of a technology plan as a component of the
strategic agenda;
(20) Approve the teacher education programs in the public institutions that comply with standards established by
the Education Professional Standards Board pursuant to KRS 161.028;
(21) Constitute the representative agency of the Commonwealth in all matters of postsecondary education of a
general and statewide nature which are not otherwise delegated to one (1) or more institutions of
postsecondary learning. The responsibility may be exercised through appropriate contractual relationships with
individuals or agencies located within or without the Commonwealth. The authority includes but is not limited
to contractual arrangements for programs of research, specialized training, and cultural enrichment;
(22) Maintain procedures for the approval of a designated receiver to provide for the maintenance of student
records of the public institutions of higher education and the colleges as defined in KRS 164.945, and
institutions operating pursuant to KRS 165A.310 which offer collegiate level courses for academic credit,
which cease to operate. Procedures shall include assurances that, upon proper request, subject to federal and
state laws and regulations, copies of student records shall be made available within a reasonable length of time
for a minimum fee;
(23) Monitor and transmit a report on compliance with KRS 164.351 to the director of the Legislative Research
Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children;
(24) (a) Develop in cooperation with each public university and the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System a comprehensive orientation and education program for new members of the council
and the governing boards and continuing education opportunities for all council and board members.
For new members of the council and institutional governing boards, the council shall:
1. Ensure that the orientation and education program comprises six (6) hours of instruction time and
includes but is not limited to information concerning the roles of the council and governing board
members, the strategic agenda and the strategic implementation plan, and the respective
institution's mission, budget and finances, strategic plans and priorities, institutional policies and
procedures, board fiduciary responsibilities, legal considerations including open records and
open meetings requirements, ethical considerations arising from board membership, and the
board member removal and replacement provisions of KRS 63.080;
2. Establish delivery methods by which the orientation and education program can be completed in
person or electronically by new members within one (1) year of their appointment or election;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Provide an annual report to the Governor and Legislative Research Commission of those new
board members who do not complete the required orientation and education program; and
4. Invite governing board members of private colleges and universities licensed by the Council on
Postsecondary Education to participate in the orientation and education program described in this
subsection;
(b) Offer, in cooperation with the public universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, continuing education opportunities for all council and governing board members; and
(c) Review and approve the orientation programs of each public university and the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System for their governing board members to ensure that all programs and
information adhere to this subsection;
(25) Develop a financial reporting procedure to be used by all state postsecondary education institutions to ensure
uniformity of financial information available to state agencies and the public;
(26) Select and appoint a president of the council under KRS 164.013;
(27) Employ consultants and other persons and employees as may be required for the council's operations,
functions, and responsibilities;
(28) Promulgate administrative regulations, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, governing its powers, duties,
and responsibilities as described in this section;
(29) Prepare and present by January 31 of each year an annual status report on postsecondary education in the
Commonwealth to the Governor[, the Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education,] and the Legislative
Research Commission;
(30) Consider the role, function, and capacity of independent institutions of postsecondary education in developing
policies to meet the immediate and future needs of the state. When it is found that independent institutions can
meet state needs effectively, state resources may be used to contract with or otherwise assist independent
institutions in meeting these needs;
(31) Create advisory groups representing the presidents, faculty, nonteaching staff, and students of the public
postsecondary education system and the independent colleges and universities;
(32) Develop a statewide policy to promote employee and faculty development in state and locally operated
secondary area technology centers through the waiver of tuition for college credit coursework in the public
postsecondary education system. Any regular full-time employee of a state or locally operated secondary area
technology center may, with prior administrative approval of the course offering institution, take a maximum
of six (6) credit hours per term at any public postsecondary institution. The institution shall waive the tuition
up to a maximum of six (6) credit hours per term. The employee shall complete the Free Application for
Federal Student Aid to determine the level of need and eligibility for state and federal financial aid programs.
The amount of tuition waived shall not exceed the cost of tuition at the institution less any state or federal
grants received, which shall be credited first to the student's tuition;
(33) Participate with the Kentucky Department of Education, the Kentucky Board of Education, and postsecondary
education institutions to ensure that academic content requirements for successful entry into postsecondary
education programs are aligned with high school content standards and that students who master the high
school academic content standards shall not need remedial courses. The council shall monitor the results on an
ongoing basis;
(34) Cooperate with the Kentucky Department of Education and the Education Professional Standards Board in
providing information sessions to selected postsecondary education content faculty and teacher educators of
the high school academic content standards as required under KRS 158.6453(2)(l);
(35) Cooperate with the Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics and ensure the participation of the public
institutions as required in KRS 151B.133;
(36) Pursuant to KRS 63.080, review written notices from the Governor or from a board of trustees or board of
regents concerning removal of a board member or the entire appointed membership of a board, investigate the
member or board and the conduct alleged to support removal, and make written recommendations to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission as to whether the member or board should be removed;
and

CHAPTER 171 7
(37) Exercise any other powers, duties, and responsibilities necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant the Council on Postsecondary Education authority to
disestablish or eliminate any college of law which became a part of the state system of higher education
through merger with a state college.
Section 4. KRS 164.321 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Eastern Kentucky University, Morehead State University, Murray State University, Western Kentucky
University, Kentucky State University, Northern Kentucky University, and the Kentucky Community
and Technical College System shall each be governed by a board of regents appointed for a term set by
law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b)[(a)] Each board of the comprehensive universities shall consist of eight (8) members appointed by the
Governor, one (1) member of the teaching faculty, one (1) member of the university nonteaching
personnel, and one (1) member of the student body of the respective university or college. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The members of the board
shall select a chairperson annually.
(c)[(b)] The board of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall consist of eight (8)
members appointed by the Governor, two (2) members of the teaching faculty, two (2) members of the
nonteaching personnel, and two (2) members of the student body. The members appointed by the
Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.
1. No more than three (3) appointed members of the board shall reside in any one (1) judicial
district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the date of the appointment.
2. A change in residency of a gubernatorial appointee after the date of appointment shall not affect
the appointee's ability to serve or eligibility for reappointment, except an appointee who assumes
residency outside the fifty (50) United States shall become immediately ineligible to serve. The
Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his or her ineligibility to serve.
3. In making initial appointments, the Governor shall act so as to provide equal representation of
the two (2) sexes. In filling vacancies, the Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as
possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex that is the
lesser represented at the time of the appointment. If the remaining membership already has an
equal number of males and females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex.
(2) The terms of appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their successors are appointed and
qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4). [, except the
initial appointments to the board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
be as follows:
(a) One (1) member shall serve a one (1) year term;
(b) One (1) member shall serve a two (2) year term;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) One (1) member shall serve a four (4) year term;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) Two (2) members shall serve six (6) year terms.
]New appointees of a board of regents shall not serve for more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(3) The gubernatorial appointments may include one (1) graduate of the respective institution who resides outside
the Commonwealth. Not more than two (2) appointed members of any board shall be residents of one (1)
county. The appointments shall reflect the proportional representation of the two (2) leading political parties of
the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of each appointee as of
December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall
not be a prerequisite to appointment to any board generally; however, if any person is appointed to a board that
does not represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional
representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number
of members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties.
Membership on the board shall reflect no less than proportional representation of the minority racial
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
composition of the Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census
or estimate data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority
representation does not result in a whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole
number. Membership on the board shall not be incompatible with any state office. A change in residency after
the date of appointment shall not affect a member's ability to serve nor shall it prevent a member's eligibility
for reappointment, except a member who assumes residency outside the fifty (50) United States shall become
immediately ineligible to serve. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall notify the appointee of his or
her ineligibility to serve.
(4) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner and within the same time after the
occurrence of the vacancy as regular appointments. The person appointed shall hold the position for the
unexpired term only.
(5) Each member of the board shall serve for the term for which the member is appointed and until a successor is
appointed and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4).
(6) (a) The faculty member of a comprehensive university shall be a teaching or research member of the
faculty of his or her respective university of the rank of assistant professor or above. The faculty
member shall be elected by secret ballot by all faculty members of his or her university of the rank of
instructor, assistant professor, or above. The faculty member shall serve for a term of three (3) years
and until his successor is elected and qualified. The faculty member shall be eligible for reelection, but
he or she shall not be eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases being a
member of the teaching staff of the university. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term
in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(b) The faculty members of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall be represented
by one (1) faculty member elected from the community colleges and one (1) faculty member elected
from the technical institutions to serve three (3) year terms and until their successors are named. The
faculty representative of each branch shall be elected by means of a process established by the board.
The faculty members may be reelected but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A
faculty member shall be ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases to
be a member of the faculty at one (1) of the institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies
shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election. These two (2)
members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member.
(7) (a) The nonteaching personnel member in a comprehensive university shall be any full-time staff member
excluding the president, vice presidents, academic deans, and academic department chairpersons. He or
she shall represent all nonteaching university employees including, but not limited to, building facilities
and clerical personnel. The member shall be elected by secret ballot by the nonteaching employees. The
nonteaching personnel member shall serve a term of three (3) years and until a successor is elected and
qualified. The nonteaching personnel member shall be eligible for reelection, but he or she shall not be
eligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if he or she ceases being an employee of the
university. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for
the original election.
(b) The nonteaching personnel members in the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
be any full-time staff member excluding a president, chancellor, vice president, academic dean,
academic department chair, or other administrator. They shall represent all nonteaching employees in
their respective branch institutions including, but not limited to, support and clerical personnel. One (1)
member shall be a representative from the community colleges and one (1) member shall be a
representative from the technical institutions. They shall serve three (3) year terms and until their
successors are named. These two (2) members shall collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast
one-half (1/2) vote by each member. The nonteaching personnel members of each branch shall be
elected by means of a process established by the board. A nonteaching personnel member may be
reelected but shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms. A nonteaching employee shall be
ineligible to continue to serve as a member of the board if that employee ceases to be a nonteaching
employee at one (1) of the institutions within the system. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the
unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(8) (a) The student member on a comprehensive university board shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on
July 1 after being elected and sworn in as student body president and ending on the following June 30.
If the student member does not maintain the position as student body president or the status as a full-

CHAPTER 171 9
time student at any time during that academic year, a special election shall be held to select a full-time
student member. The elected student member shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) Two (2) full-time student members shall be elected to the board of regents for the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System. One (1) shall represent students of the community colleges
and one (1) shall represent the technical institutions. The student members shall be elected by means of
a process established by the board. The student members shall serve one (1) year terms beginning on
July 1 after being elected and sworn in as a student member of the board and ending on the following
June 30. If the student member does not maintain the status as a full-time student, a special election
shall be held to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. The two (2) members shall
collectively have one (1) vote which may be cast one-half (1/2) vote by each member.
(9) (a) All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an orientation and education
program prescribed by the council under KRS 164.020(24), as a condition of their service and eligibility
for appointment or election to a second term.
(b) Attendance at an orientation and education program as required in paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall not constitute a meeting for the purposes of KRS 61.800 to 61.850 if official action is not taken,
regardless of how many board members are in attendance.
(10) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following circumstances:
(a) For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
(b) Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(11) The inability of the board or boards of the comprehensive universities or Kentucky Community and Technical
College System to hold quarterly meetings, to elect a chairperson annually, to establish a quorum, to adopt an
annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the president of the university or system,
to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the university's or system's progress in implementing
its mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties under
KRS 164.350 shall be cause for the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board or boards and
replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 5. KRS 15.257 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of the Attorney General shall, within ninety (90) days of June 20, 2005, and thereafter, within
ninety (90) days of the effective date of any legislation amending the provisions of the Open Meetings Act or
the Open Records Act, distribute to all county judge/executives, mayors, county attorneys, city attorneys,
superintendents of public school districts, presidents of each of the state public postsecondary education
institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or Section 1 of this Act[164.001(13) or (17)], and attorneys of
public school districts and public postsecondary education institutions throughout Kentucky written
information prepared by the Office of the Attorney General that explains the procedural and substantive
provisions of the Open Meetings Act, KRS 61.805 to 61.850, and the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884, together with the information required by KRS 171.223 to be prepared by the Department for Libraries
and Archives concerning proper retention and management of public records. This distribution may be by
electronic means.
(2) All superintendents of public school districts and the presidents of each of the state public postsecondary
education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or Section 1 of this Act[164.001 (13) or (17)] shall be
responsible for designating and submitting the names and addresses of the attorneys to whom this information
shall be disseminated to the Office of the Attorney General.
Section 6. KRS 164.011 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby created and established a Council on Postsecondary Education in Kentucky as an agency,
instrumentality, and political subdivision of the Commonwealth and a public body corporate and politic having
all powers, duties, and responsibilities as are provided to it by law, appointed for a term set by law pursuant to
Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The council shall be composed of the commissioner of education,
a faculty member, a student member, and thirteen (13) citizen members appointed by the Governor. The
citizen members shall be confirmed by the Senate under KRS 11.160, and the commissioner of education shall
serve as a nonvoting ex officio member. Citizen council members shall be selected from a list of nominees
provided to the Governor under the nominating process set forth in KRS 164.005. If the General Assembly is
not in session at the time of the appointment, persons appointed shall serve prior to confirmation, but the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Governor shall seek the consent of the Senate at the next regular session or at an intervening extraordinary
session if the matter is included in the call of the General Assembly.
(2) By no later than thirty (30) days after May 30, 1997, the Governor's Postsecondary Education Nominating
Committee shall submit nominations to the Governor as set forth in KRS 164.005. On making appointments to
the council, the Governor shall ensure broad geographical and political representation; ensure equal
representation of the two (2) sexes, inasmuch as possible; ensure no less than proportional representation of
the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the
political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her
appointment; and ensure that appointments reflect the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth
based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census or estimate data from the United
States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority representation does not result in a whole
number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number. A particular political affiliation
shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the council generally; however, if any person is appointed to the
council that does not represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the
proportional representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the
total number of members on the council less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading
political parties. In filling vacancies to the council, the Governor shall act so as to provide, inasmuch as
possible, equal representation of the two (2) sexes by appointing a member of the sex that is the lesser
represented at the time of the appointment. If the remaining membership already has an equal number of males
and females, the Governor may appoint a member of either sex. No more than two (2) members of the council
shall hold an undergraduate degree from any one (1) Kentucky university, and no more than three (3) voting
members of the council shall reside in any one (1) judicial district of the Kentucky Supreme Court as of the
date of the appointment. However, change in residency after the date of appointment shall not affect the ability
to serve.
(3) One (1) member shall be a full-time faculty member employed at a state institution of postsecondary
education. The faculty member shall be appointed to a four (4) year term by the Governor from a list of three
(3) nominees selected and submitted by majority vote of the ten (10) faculty members who serve as faculty
representatives of the boards of trustees and boards of regents of the nine (9) postsecondary education
institutions.
(4) One (1) member shall be enrolled as a full-time student at a state institution of postsecondary education and
shall be selected annually in the following manner: not later than June 1 of each year the eight (8) student body
presidents of the four (4) year state public institutions of higher education, the two (2) student members to the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and one (1) student body president representing the
members of the Association of Independent Kentucky Colleges and Universities shall elect by majority vote
three (3) nominees to submit to the Governor. From this list of nominees, the Governor shall appoint a student
member.
(5) In filling any vacancies, the Governor shall ensure the continuing representation upon the council of the broad
constituencies as set forth in subsection (2) of this section. Vacancies on the council shall be filled for the
unexpired term in accordance with the procedures established for the original appointments.
(6) Each citizen member shall serve a term of six (6) years unless removed by the Governor for cause[, except the
initial appointments shall be as follows:
(a) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1997;
(b) Three (3) appointments shall expire December 31, 1998;
(c) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 1999;
(d) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2000;
(e) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2001; and
(f) Two (2) appointments shall expire December 31, 2002].
(7) Any person, other than the chief state school officer, holding either an elective or appointive state office or
who is a member of the governing board of any state university in Kentucky, shall be ineligible for
membership or appointment on the council during his term.

CHAPTER 171 11
(8) The members of the council shall elect the chair and the vice chair of the council from among the council's
membership, and the chair and vice chair shall serve at the pleasure of the council. The vice chair shall serve
as chair in the absence of the chair.
(9) The council shall meet at least quarterly and at other times upon the call of the chair or a majority of the
council.
(10) A quorum shall be a majority of the appointive membership of the council.
(11) A quorum shall be required to organize and conduct the business of the council, except that an affirmative vote
of eight (8) or more appointive members of the entire council shall be required to dismiss from employment
the president of the council, and to adopt or amend the state strategic postsecondary education agenda.
(12) New appointees to the council shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(13) New appointees to the council shall complete an orientation and education program set forth in KRS
164.020(24) to be eligible for appointment to a second term.
Section 7. KRS 164.2843 is amended to read as follows:
Each institution of the postsecondary education system, as defined in KRS 164.001[(17)], that provides in-state
tuition for nonresident children of graduates may provide the same in-state tuition for nonresident siblings of
graduates.
Section 8. KRS 164.465 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The presidents of state postsecondary education institutions identified in KRS 161.220(4)(b) or 164.001[(13)
or (17)] shall distribute the written information provided by the Office of the Attorney General and the
Department for Libraries and Archives under KRS 15.257 and 171.223 to each board of regents or governing
board member of their university. Distribution shall be accomplished within sixty (60) days of receiving the
written information from the Office of the Attorney General and the Department for Libraries and Archives.
Distribution to newly appointed members shall be accomplished within sixty (60) days of their appointment.
The distribution may be by electronic means.
(2) The presidents of state public postsecondary education institutions, as identified in subsection (1) of this
section, shall require signatory proof that each board of regents or governing board member has received the
written information as required under subsection (1) of this section, shall maintain documentation of receipt on
file, and shall certify to the Office of the Attorney General that the written information has been distributed as
required.
Section 9. KRS 164.821 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The government of the University of Louisville is vested in a board of trustees appointed for a term set by law
pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The board shall consist of ten (10) members appointed
by the Governor, at least one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the university; one (1) member of the teaching
faculty of the University of Louisville who shall be the chief executive of the ranking unit of faculty
government; one (1) member of the permanent staff of the University of Louisville who shall be the chief
executive of the staff senate; and one (1) student member who shall be the president of the student body during
the appropriate academic year. The members appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by
the Senate.
(a) 1. All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an orientation and
education program prescribed by the council under KRS 164.020(24), as a condition of their
service and eligibility for appointment or election to a second term.
2. Attendance at an orientation and education program required in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall not constitute a meeting for the purposes of KRS 61.800 to 61.850 if official
action is not taken, regardless of how many board members are in attendance.
(b) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(c) New appointees to the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as
student body president and ending on the following June 30. If the student member does not maintain the
position of student body president or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a
special election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student member shall serve for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
(3) The faculty member and staff member shall serve one (1) year terms and cease to be eligible for membership
on the board of trustees upon termination of their respective relationships with, or leadership positions within,
the university, and vacancies occurring for this reason shall be filled for the remainder of the respective terms
in the same manner.
(4) The gubernatorial appointments shall serve a term of six (6) years and until their successors are appointed and
qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4)[, except the
initial terms shall be as follows:
(a) Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
(b) Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms;
(c) Two (2) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
(d) Two (2) members shall serve four (4) year terms;
(e) One (1) member shall serve a five (5) year term; and
(f) One (1) member shall serve a six (6) year term].
(5) The Governor shall make [his ]at-large appointments so as to divide the appointed representation upon the
board to reflect:
(a) The proportional representation of the two (2) leading political parties in the Commonwealth based on
the state's voter registration and the political affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year
preceding the date of his or her appointment. A particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite
to appointment to the board generally; however, if any person is appointed to the board that does not
represent either of the two (2) leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional
representation by political affiliation requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total
number of members on the board less any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading
political parties; and
(b) No less than the proportional representation of the minority racial composition of the Commonwealth
based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census or estimate data from the
United States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority representation does not
result in a whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole number.
(6) Vacancies among the appointed members of the board occurring by death, resignation, or any other cause,
other than expiration of a term, shall be filled by appointments made by the Governor for the remainder of the
unexpired term, subject to the qualifications set forth in this section.
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS 164.367, no member of the
teaching or administrative staff of the university shall be directly or indirectly interested in any contract with
the university for the sale of property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with the exception of
compensation to the faculty, staff, and student members.
(8) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually, to establish a quorum, to
adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the president of the university,
to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its mission,
goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda, or to otherwise perform its duties under KRS 164.830
shall be cause for the Governor to remove all appointed members of the board and replace the entire appointed
membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 10. KRS 164.330 is amended to read as follows:
[Each board of regents shall hold its first meeting within thirty (30) days after each appointment of new members. ]At
the first meeting of the board of regents following an appointment of a new member, unless the member was
appointed to serve the remainder of an unexpired term,[this meeting] there shall be elected a vice chairperson and a
secretary for the board. Each board shall appoint a treasurer, and such officers as it deems necessary, but no member
of any of the boards shall be appointed treasurer. No member of any board shall draw any salary for his or her

CHAPTER 171 13
services, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenditures made in going to and from each meeting of the board and
for other legitimate expenses, except a member who resides outside the Commonwealth shall not be reimbursed for
out-of-state travel. The expenses shall be paid out of the funds of the appropriate institution.
Section 11. KRS 164.0203 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall adopt a strategic agenda that identifies specific short-term
objectives in furtherance of the long-term goals of postsecondary education in the
Commonwealth[established in KRS 164.003(2)].
(2) (a) The purpose of the strategic agenda is to create[further the public purposes under KRS 164.003 by
creating] high-quality, relevant, postsecondary education and adult education opportunities in the
Commonwealth. The strategic agenda shall:
1. Serve as the public agenda for postsecondary education and adult education for the citizens of the
Commonwealth, providing statewide priorities and a vision for long-term economic growth;
2. State those important issues and aspirations of the Commonwealth's students, employers, and
workforce reflecting high expectations for their performance and the performance of the
educational institutions and providers that serve them; and
3. Sustain a long-term commitment for constant improvement, while valuing market-driven
responsiveness, accountability to the public, technology-based strategies, and incentive-based
motivation.
(b) The council shall develop a strategic implementation plan, which may be periodically revised, to
achieve the strategic agenda. The strategic agenda shall serve as a guide for institutional plans and
missions.
(3) The framework for the strategic implementation plan of the strategic agenda shall include the following
elements:
(a) A mission statement;
(b) Goals;
(c) Principles;
(d) Strategies and objectives;
(e) Benchmarks; and
(f) Incentives to achieve desired results.
(4) The implementation plan for the strategic agenda shall take into consideration the value to society of a quality
liberal arts education and the needs and concerns of Kentucky's employers.
(5) The council shall develop benchmarks using criteria that shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Use of the statistical information commonly provided by governmental and regulatory agencies or
specific data gathered by authorization of the council;
(b) Comparison of regions and areas within the Commonwealth and comparisons of the Commonwealth to
other states and the nation; and
(c) Measures of educational attainment, effectiveness, and efficiency, including but not limited to those set
forth in KRS 164.095.
(6) [The council shall review the goals established by KRS 164.003(2) at least every four (4) years and shall
review its implementation plan at least every two (2) years.
(7) ]In developing the strategic agenda, the council shall actively seek input from the Department of Education
and local school districts to create necessary linkages to assure a smooth and effective transition for students
from the elementary and secondary education system to the postsecondary education system. Upon completion
of the strategic agenda and strategic implementation plan, the council shall distribute copies to each local
school district.
(7)[(8)] The strategic agenda shall include a long-term strategy, developed in partnership with the Office of
Adult Education, for raising the knowledge and skills of Kentucky's adult population, and ensuring lifelong
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
learning opportunities for all Kentucky adults, drawing on the resources of all state government cabinets and
agencies, business and civic leadership, and voluntary organizations.
Section 12. KRS 164.7911 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is established and created in the Council on Postsecondary Education a Strategic Investment and
Incentive Funding Program for postsecondary education to consist of a system of strategic financial assistance
awards to institutions, systems, agencies, and programs of postsecondary education to advance the goals of
postsecondary education in the Commonwealth[as stated in KRS 164.003(2)]. There are established in the
State Treasury the following individual strategic investment and incentive trust funds:
(a) A research challenge trust fund;
(b) A comprehensive university excellence trust fund;
(c) A technology initiative trust fund;
(d) A physical facilities trust fund;
(e) A postsecondary workforce development trust fund; and
(f) A student financial aid and advancement trust fund.
(2) The funding program and the individual trust funds are created to provide financial assistance to the
institutions, systems, agencies, and programs of postsecondary education each fiscal biennium. It is the intent
of the General Assembly to make appropriations, including general fund appropriations, each fiscal biennium
to each of the individual trust funds in the funding program in a form and manner consistent with the strategic
agenda adopted by the Council on Postsecondary Education. Appropriations made to individual trust funds in
the Strategic Investment and Incentive Funding Program shall not lapse at the end of a fiscal year but shall be
carried forward in the respective trust fund accounts and shall be available for allotment for their respective
purposes in the next fiscal year.
Section 13. KRS 164.7917 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The research challenge trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 may include separate, subsidiary programs
and related accounts, such as an Endowed Professorship Matching Program, an Endowed Chairs
Matching Program, an External Research Grant Matching Program, a Graduate Assistant Program, a
Junior Faculty Research Encouragement Program, or other programs and related accounts as
determined through the biennial budget process for the Council on Postsecondary Education.
(b) Appropriations to the research challenge trust fund are to encourage research activities at the University
of Kentucky and at the University of Louisville[ so that these institutions may achieve the goals
established in KRS 164.003(2)].
(c) Funds appropriated to the research challenge trust fund shall be apportioned two-thirds (2/3) to the
University of Kentucky and one-third (1/3) to the University of Louisville.
(2) The Council on Postsecondary Education shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an
application under this section. The evaluation of all applications for support of specific faculty research
projects, if such projects are included in the university's plan for use of research trust funds, shall be subject to
review and ranking by an external panel of experts appointed according to guidelines and procedures approved
by the council in consultation with the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville. The
University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville may apply to the council for financial assistance from
the research challenge trust fund. The council shall determine the matching funds or internal reallocation
requirements from the applicants to qualify for funding. Financial assistance that may be awarded by the
council shall be consistent with the adopted strategic agenda, the biennial budget process, and the availability
of any resources to the research challenge trust fund.
Section 14. KRS 164.7919 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The comprehensive university excellence trust fund created by KRS 164.7911 shall consist of six (6)
separate accounts: one (1) for Eastern Kentucky University; one (1) for Kentucky State University; one
(1) for Morehead State University; one (1) for Murray State University; one (1) for Northern Kentucky
University; and one (1) for Western Kentucky University.
(b) Funds appropriated to the comprehensive university excellence trust fund or any subsidiary fund created
by the Council on Postsecondary Education shall be apportioned to each of the comprehensive

CHAPTER 171 15
universities proportional to their respective share of total general fund appropriations in each fiscal year,
excluding debt service appropriations and specialized, noninstructional appropriations.
(c) The purpose of the comprehensive university excellence trust fund is to provide financial assistance to
encourage comprehensive universities to develop at least one (1) nationally recognized program of
distinction or at least one (1) nationally recognized applied research program[ consistent with the goals
established in KRS 164.003(2)].
(2) The council shall develop the criteria and process for submission of an application under this section. Each
university may apply to the council for financial assistance from the comprehensive university excellence trust
fund. The council shall determine the matching funds or internal reallocation requirements from the applicants
to qualify for funding. Financial assistance that may be awarded by the council shall be consistent with the
adopted strategic agenda, the biennial budget process, and the availability of any resources to the
comprehensive university excellence trust fund.
Section 15. KRS 45.238 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Debts that are certified by an agency or by a local government as provided in KRS 45.237 shall be referred to
the department for collection. The department shall be vested with all the powers necessary to collect any
referred debts.
(2) (a) For those debts deemed unfeasible or cost ineffective to pursue, the department shall maintain written
records of the debt and the reason the debt was deemed unfeasible or cost ineffective to pursue.
(b) In the case of agencies, these debts shall be written off in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated under the authority of subsection (6) of this section.
(c) In the case of local governments, these debts shall be returned to the referring local government for
further action.
(d) In the case of public postsecondary education institutions, these debts shall be returned to the
referring institution, except that enrollment-related debts and liquidated debts shall only be returned
to the referring institution in accordance with Section 16 of this Act.
(3) (a) All certified debts of agencies received by the department after the sixty (60) day collection period
allowed in KRS 45.237(4), and all certified debts of a local government received by the department
after the ninety (90) day collection period allowed by KRS 45.237(5), shall be subject to:
1. Interest at the tax interest rate determined under KRS 131.183 on the amount of the debt plus all
accruals authorized by law, from the date the debt is certified to the department until it is
satisfied; and
2. A one (1) time twenty-five percent (25%) collection fee imposed on the amount of the debt plus
all accruals authorized by law, as of the time of referral.
(b) The department may retain the collection fee.
(c) In the case of agencies and the Court of Justice, recovered funds and interest may, at the discretion of
the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, be returned to the agency certifying the debt or
improper payment or to the Court of Justice for allocation as otherwise provided by law. If the
recovered funds and interest are not returned to the agency or Court of Justice, the amounts shall be
deposited in the budget reserve trust fund established in KRS 48.705, except for Medicaid benefits and
funds required by law to be remitted to a federal agency.
(d) In the case of local governments, recovered funds and interest shall be returned to the referring local
government for allocation as provided by ordinance, resolution, or as otherwise provided by law.
(e) In the case of public postsecondary education institutions, recovered funds and interest shall be
returned to the referring institution less the collection fee retained by the department under
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(4) The commissioner of the department may refer to the Attorney General any unsatisfied claim, demand,
account, or judgment in favor of the Commonwealth for further civil or criminal action under KRS 15.060.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) (a) The department shall report annually by October 1 to the Legislative Research Commission on all
referred certified debts, including at least a summary of the debts by agency, fund type, and age, the
latter compiled in the following four (4) categories:
1. Debts from ninety (90) to one hundred seventy-nine (179) days old;
2. Debts from one hundred eighty (180) to three hundred sixty-four (364) days old;
3. Debts over one (1) year old but less than three (3) years old; and
4. Debts three (3) years old or older.
(b) The annual report shall also include the collection amount of the debts in paragraph (a) of this
subsection and the accounts to which the amounts are credited.
(6) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish
standards that agencies shall use in determining when to write debts off the books.
(7) This section shall not affect the collection of delinquent taxes by sheriffs or county attorneys under KRS
91A.070 or 134.504.
Section 16. KRS 45.241 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section and Section 15 of this Act:
(a) "Debt" means:
1. For agencies, a sum certain which has been certified by an agency as due and owing; and
2. For local governments, a sum certain which has been certified by a local government as due and
owing, including but not limited to any delinquent taxes or fees other than delinquent real and
personal property taxes;
(b) "Liquidated debt" means:
1. For agencies, a legal debt for a sum certain which has been certified by an agency as final due
and owing, all appeals and legal actions having been exhausted;
2. For local governments, a legal debt for a sum certain which has been certified by a local
government as final due and owing, all appeals and legal actions having been exhausted,
including but not limited to any delinquent taxes or fees other than delinquent real and personal
property taxes; and
3. For the Court of Justice, a legal debt including any fine, fee, court costs, or restitution due the
Commonwealth, which have been imposed by a final sentence of a trial court of the
Commonwealth and for which the time permitted for payment pursuant to the provisions of KRS
534.020 has expired;
(c) "Agency" means an organizational unit or administrative body in the executive branch of state
government, as defined in KRS 12.010;
(d) "Department" means the Department of Revenue;
(e) "Court of Justice" means the Administrative Office of the Courts, all courts, and all clerks of the courts;
(f) "Forgivable loan agreement" means a loan agreement entered into between an agency and a borrower
that establishes specific conditions, which, if satisfied by the borrower, allows the agency to forgive a
portion or all of the loan;
(g) "Improper payment" means a payment made to a vendor, provider, or recipient due to error, fraud, or
abuse;[ and]
(h) "Local government" means any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local government,
charter county, or unified local government of the Commonwealth; and
(i) "Enrollment-related debt" means a sum certain which has been certified by a public postsecondary
education institution as due and owing by virtue of enrollment at the institution, including debt
incurred for tuition, fees, student housing, student dining, and other enrollment-related costs.
(2) Each agency and the Court of Justice shall develop, maintain, and update in a timely manner an ongoing
inventory of each debt owed to it, including debts due to improper payments, and shall make every reasonable

CHAPTER 171 17
effort to collect each debt. Within sixty (60) days after the identification of a debt, each agency shall begin
administrative action to collect the debt.
(3) The Auditor of Public Accounts shall review each agency's debt identification and collection procedures as
part of the annual audit of state agencies.
(4) An agency shall not forgive any debt owed to it unless that agency has entered into a forgivable loan
agreement with a borrower, or unless otherwise provided by statute.
(5) For those agencies without statutory procedures for collecting debts, the Department of Revenue shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to prescribe standards and
procedures with which those agencies shall comply regarding collection of debts, notices to persons owing
debt, information to be monitored concerning the debts, and an appeals process.
(6) (a) Each agency and the Court of Justice shall identify all liquidated debts, including debts due to improper
payments, and shall submit a list of those liquidated debts in the form and manner prescribed by the
department to the department for review. The department shall review the information submitted by the
agencies and the Court of Justice and shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt of the information,
determine whether it would be cost-effective for the department to further pursue collection of the
liquidated debts.
(b) A local government, after making reasonable efforts to collect its debts, may by ordinance, resolution,
or otherwise pursuant to law, submit a list of its liquidated debts that have been due and owing for more
than ninety (90) days to the department for review to determine whether it would be cost-effective for
the department to pursue collection of the liquidated debts. The department shall review the information
submitted by a local government and shall, within ninety (90) days of receipt of the information,
determine whether it would be cost-effective for the department to further pursue collection of the
liquidated debts.
(c) The department may, after consultation with the agency, Court of Justice, or a local government, return
the liquidated debt to the entity submitting the liquidated debt if:
1. The request for review contains insufficient information; or
2. The debt is not feasible to collect.
Any return of a liquidated debt shall be in writing, and shall state why the debt is being returned.
(d) The department shall identify in writing to the submitting agency, Court of Justice, or local government,
the liquidated debts it has determined that it can pursue in a cost-effective manner, and the agency,
Court of Justice, or local government shall officially refer the identified liquidated debts to the
department for collection.
(e) The agency, Court of Justice, and local government shall retain a complete record of all liquidated debts
referred to the department for collection until the debt is collected, forgiven, or returned as
uncollectible.
(f) Each agency, the Court of Justice, and local government shall make appropriate accounting of any
uncollected debt as prescribed by law.
(7) (a) If the agency recovers the debt funds prior to referral to the department, the agency shall retain the
collected funds in accordance with its statutory authority.
(b) 1. Upon referral of a liquidated debt or enrollment-related debt to the department, the liquidated
debt or enrollment-related debt shall accrue the following amounts:
a. Interest on the total amount of the debt plus legal accruals at the tax interest rate provided
in KRS 131.183, from the time of referral until paid; and
b. A one (1) time twenty-five percent (25%) collection fee on the total amount of the debt
plus legal accruals, as of the time of referral;
unless the interest and collection fee are waived by the department.
2. The interest and collection fee shall be in addition to any other costs accrued prior to the time of
referral.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. The department may deduct and retain from the liquidated debt recovered an amount equal to the
lesser of the collection fee or the actual expenses incurred in the collection of the debt.
4. In the case of agencies and the Court of Justice, any funds recovered by the department after the
deduction of the department's cost of collection expenses may, at the discretion of the secretary
of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, be returned to the agency identifying the liquidated
debt or to the Court of Justice for allocation as otherwise provided by law. If the recovered funds
and interest are not returned to the agency or Court of Justice, the amounts shall be deposited in
the general fund, except for Medicaid benefits funds and funds required by law to be remitted to
a federal agency, which shall be remitted as required by law.
5. In the case of local governments, any funds recovered by the department after the deduction of
the department's cost of collection expenses shall be returned to the local government referring
the liquidated debt, for allocation as provided by ordinance, resolution, or as otherwise provided
by law.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from entering into a memorandum of agreement
with an agency pursuant to KRS 131.130(11), for collection of debts prior to liquidation. If an agency
enters into an agreement with the department, the agency shall retain funds collected according to the
provisions of the agreement.
(d) This section shall not affect any agreement between the department and an agency entered into under
KRS 131.130(11) that is in effect on July 13, 2004, that provides for the collection of liquidated debts
by the department on behalf of the agency.
(e) This section shall not affect the collection of delinquent taxes by sheriffs or county attorneys under
KRS 91A.070 or 134.504.
(f) This section shall not affect the collection of performance or reclamation bonds.
(g) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, each public postsecondary education
institution and the department:
a. Shall enter into an annual memorandum of agreement pursuant to Section 17 of this
Act for collection of enrollment-related debts and liquidated debts referred by the
institution; and
b. May enter into a memorandum of agreement pursuant to Section 17 of this Act for
collection of other debts prior to liquidation.
2. The department is authorized to collect enrollment-related debts, liquidated debts, and other
debts designated in a memorandum of agreement with a public postsecondary education
institution on behalf of a referring institution.
3. The department shall not decline to collect a specific enrollment-related debt or liquidated debt
that is referred to the department by a public postsecondary education institution unless the
department:
a. Performs an individualized analysis of the debt;
b. Determines that the debt is not:
i. An enrollment-related debt;
ii. Liquidated debt; or
iii. Feasible to collect; and
c. Provides a written statement to the referring institution that includes an individualized
analysis of the reason the specific debt cannot be collected by the department.
(8) Upon receipt of a referred liquidated debt or enrollment-related debt and after its determination that the debt
is feasible and cost-effective to collect, the department shall pursue collection of the referred debt in
accordance with KRS 131.030.
(9) By administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, the department shall prescribe the
electronic format and form of, and the information required in, a referral.

CHAPTER 171 19
(10) (a) The department shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue on the collection of debts, including debts due to improper payments, referred by agencies
and the Court of Justice. The report shall include the total amount by agency and fund type of liquidated
debt that has been referred to the department; the amount of each referring agency's liquidated debt, by
fund type, that has been collected by the department; and the total amount of each referring agency's
liquidated debt, by fund type, that the department determined to be cost-ineffective to collect, including
the reasons for the determinations.
(b) Each cabinet shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue on:
1. The amount of previous fiscal year unliquidated debt by agency, including debts due to improper
payments, fund type, category, and age, the latter to be categorized as less than one (1) year, less
than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over ten (10) years; and
2. The amount, by agency, of liquidated debt, including debts due to improper payments, not
referred to the department; a summary, by criteria listed in subsection (6)(a) of this section, of
reasons the department provided for not requesting referral of those liquidated debts; and a
summary of the actions each agency is taking to collect those liquidated debts.
(c) Beginning on October 1, 2005, the Court of Justice shall report annually by October 1 of each year to
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue the amount of previous fiscal year
unliquidated debt by county and whether in the Circuit Court or District Court; and fund type and age,
the latter categorized as less than one (1) year, less than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over
ten (10) years. The first year for which the Court of Justice shall be required to report is the fiscal year
beginning on July 1, 2004 and ending on June 30, 2005. The Court of Justice shall not be required to
report unliquidated debts in existence prior to July 1, 2004.
(d) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report annually by October 1 to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on the amount of the General Government Cabinet's
unliquidated debt by agency, fund type, and age, the latter categorized as less than one (1) year, less
than five (5) years, less than ten (10) years, and over ten (10) years.
(11) At the time of submission of a liquidated debt to the department for review, the referring agency, the Court of
Justice, or, where feasible, the local government shall provide information about the debt to the State Treasurer
for the Treasurer's action under KRS 44.030(1).
Section 17. KRS 131.130 is amended to read as follows:
Without limitation of other duties assigned to it by law, the following powers and duties are vested in the department:
(1) The department may promulgate administrative regulations, and direct proceedings and actions, for the
administration and enforcement of all tax laws of this state. To assist taxpayers in understanding and
interpreting the tax laws, the department may, through incorporation by reference, include examples as part of
any administrative regulation. The examples may include demonstrative, nonexclusive lists of items if the
department determines the lists would be helpful to taxpayers in understanding the application of the tax laws.
(2) The department, by representatives it appoints in writing, may take testimony or depositions, and may examine
hard copy or electronic records, any person's documents, files, and equipment if those records, documents, or
equipment will furnish knowledge concerning any taxpayer's tax liability, when it deems this reasonably
necessary to the performance of its functions. The department may enforce this right by application to the
Circuit Court in the county where the person is domiciled or has his or her principal office, or by application to
the Franklin Circuit Court, which courts may compel compliance with the orders of the department.
(3) The department shall prescribe the style, and determine and enforce the use or manner of keeping, of all
assessment and tax forms and records employed by state and county officials, and may prescribe forms
necessary for the administration of any revenue law.
(4) The department shall advise on all questions respecting the construction of state revenue laws and its
application to various classes of taxpayers and property.
(5) Attorneys employed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by the Attorney General as
provided in KRS 15.020 may prosecute all violations of the criminal and penal laws relating to revenue and
taxation. If a Finance and Administration Cabinet attorney undertakes any of the actions prescribed in this
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
subsection, that attorney shall be authorized to exercise all powers and perform all duties in respect to the
criminal actions or proceedings which the prosecuting attorney would otherwise perform or exercise, including
the authority to sign, file, and present any complaints, affidavits, information, presentments, accusations,
indictments, subpoenas, and processes of any kind, and to appear before all grand juries, courts, or tribunals.
(6) In the event of the incapacity of attorneys employed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or at the
request of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Attorney General or his or her designee
shall prosecute all violations of the criminal and penal laws relating to revenue and taxation. If the Attorney
General undertakes any of the actions prescribed in this subsection, he or she shall be authorized to exercise all
powers and perform all duties in respect to the criminal actions or proceedings which the prosecuting attorney
would otherwise perform or exercise, including but not limited to the authority to sign, file, and present any
and all complaints, affidavits, information, presentments, accusations, indictments, subpoenas, and processes
of any kind, and to appear before all grand juries, courts, or tribunals.
(7) The department may require the Commonwealth's attorneys and county attorneys to prosecute actions and
proceedings and perform other services incident to the enforcement of laws assigned to the department for
administration.
(8) (a) Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 13A, the department may research the fields of taxation, finance, and
local government administration, publish its findings, respond to the public's and taxpayers' questions,
and publish its responses.
(b) To assist taxpayers and the public in understanding and interpreting the tax laws, the department:
1. May include examples as part of any response or publication. The examples may include
demonstrative, nonexclusive lists of items, if the department determines that the list would be
helpful to taxpayers in understanding the application of the tax laws; and
2. Shall publish its administrative writings, tax forms, and instructions to those tax forms on its
official website in accordance with KRS 131.020(1)(b).
(9) The department may promulgate administrative regulations necessary to establish a system of taxpayer
identifying numbers for the purpose of securing proper identification of taxpayers subject to any tax laws or
other revenue measure of this state, and may require the taxpayer to place on any return, report, statement, or
other document required to be filed, any number assigned pursuant to the administrative regulations.
(10) The department may, when it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth and helpful to the efficient and
effective enforcement, administration, or collection of sales and use tax, motor fuels tax, or the petroleum
environmental assurance fee, enter into agreements with out-of-state retailers or other persons for the
collection and remittance of sales and use tax, the motor fuels tax, or the petroleum environmental assurance
fee.
(11) (a) The department may enter into annual memoranda of agreement with any state agency, officer, board,
commission, corporation, institution, cabinet, department, or other state organization to assume the
collection duties for any debts due the state entity, except for consumer debt owed for health care goods
and services, and may renew that agreement for up to five (5) years. Under such an agreement, the
department shall have all the powers, rights, duties, and authority with respect to the collection, refund,
and administration of those liquidated debts as provided under:
1.[(a)] KRS Chapters 131, 134, and 135 for the collection, refund, and administration of delinquent
taxes; and
2.[(b)] Any applicable statutory provisions governing the state agency, officer, board, commission,
corporation, institution, cabinet, department, or other state organization for the collection, refund,
and administration of any liquidated debts due the state entity.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, each public postsecondary education institution
and the department:
1. Shall enter into an annual memorandum of agreement for the collection of enrollment-related
debts and liquidated debts in accordance with Section 16 of this Act; and
2. May enter into an annual memorandum of agreement for the collection of other debts prior to
liquidation.

CHAPTER 171 21
Any agreement under this paragraph shall require that recovered funds and interest be returned to
the referring institution in accordance with Section 15 of this Act.
(12) Notwithstanding subsection (11) of this section, KRS 45.237, 45.238, 45.241, or 131.030, or any agreement to
the contrary, the department shall not collect or continue collection duties of any consumer debts owed for
health care goods and services. For the purpose of this section, "consumer debt" shall be defined as a debt
incurred by an individual, as defined in KRS 141.010, for a personal or family purpose, regardless of whether
an obligation has been reduced to judgment.
(13) The department may refuse to accept a personal check in payment of taxes due or collected from any person
who has ever tendered a check to the state which, when presented for payment, was not honored. Any check so
refused shall be considered as never having been tendered.
Section 18. KRS 164.525 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Center for Mathematics is hereby created to make available professional development for teachers in
reliable, research-based diagnostic assessment and intervention strategies, coaching and mentoring models,
and other programs in mathematics. The center shall be headed by an executive director and administered by
Northern Kentucky University[a public postsecondary education institution]. The center shall:
(a) Act as a clearinghouse for information about professional development programs for teachers that
address mathematics diagnostic assessment, intervention programs, coaching and mentoring programs,
and other instructional strategies to address students' needs;
(b) Collaborate with Kentucky's other public and private postsecondary institutions to develop teachers'
mathematical knowledge needed for teaching and help teachers improve students' mathematical
concepts, thinking, problem-solving, and skills, with an emphasis on diagnostic assessment and
intervention programs for students in the primary program;
(c) Provide teacher training to develop teacher leaders and teaching specialists in primary programs who
have skills in diagnostic assessment and intervention services to assist struggling students or those who
are at risk of failure in mathematics. The center may contract for services in order to carry out this
responsibility;
(d) Maintain a demonstration and training site for mathematics located at each of the public universities;
(e) Advise the Kentucky Department of Education and Kentucky Board of Education regarding:
1. Early mathematics content, diagnostic assessment practices, and intervention programs;
2. Costs and effectiveness of various mathematics intervention programs;
3. Coaching and mentoring models that help improve student achievements;
4. Trends and issues relating to mathematics programs in schools throughout the state; and
5. The establishment and implementation of the Middle School Mathematics and Science Scholars
Program established under KRS 158.848; and
(f) Disseminate information to teachers, administrators, and policymakers on an ongoing basis.
(2) On or before October 1 of each year, Northern Kentucky University shall submit a report to the Council on
Postsecondary Education and the Legislative Research Commission, for referral to the appropriate interim
joint committee, on the operation of the center and the impact of the center on student achievement[shall
select a location for the center no later than January 1, 2006. The council shall use a request for proposal
process. In developing the request for proposal, the council shall seek advice from the Committee for
Mathematics Achievement created in KRS 158.842 and the commissioner of education. The center shall be
located at the selected university through July 1, 2011, unless funding is not available, the council deems the
performance of the institute to be inadequate, or the university requests to discontinue its relationship to the
institute. Contingent upon available funding at the end of the initial cycle, and each five (5) year period
thereafter, the council shall issue a request for proposal to all public postsecondary education institutions to
administer the center].
Section 19. KRS 164.360 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Each board of regents for the universities shall appoint a president, appoint all faculty members and
employees, and fix their compensation and tenure of service, subject to the provisions of subsections (2)
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
to (5) of this section. Faculty member and employee appointment and removal decisions may be
delegated to the president in accordance with policy adopted by each board of regents.
(b) The board of regents for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall appoint a
president, appoint all faculty members and employees, and fix their compensation and tenure of service,
subject to the provisions of subsections (2) to (5) of this section. Faculty member and employee
appointment and removal decisions may be delegated to the president in accordance with policy
adopted by the board of regents.
(2) No person shall be employed at an institution where his or her relative serves on the board of regents for that
institution.
(3) Each board may remove the president of the university or Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, and the president may remove any faculty member or employee.
(4) No president or faculty member shall be removed except for cause, which shall include incompetency, neglect
of or refusal to perform his or her duty, immoral conduct, or failure to meet college or university performance
and productivity requirements as determined in accordance with subsection (5) of this section. A president or
faculty member shall not be removed until after thirty (30) days' notice in writing, stating the nature of the
charges preferred, and after an opportunity has been given him or her to make defense before the board by
counsel or otherwise and to introduce testimony which shall be heard and determined by the board. Charges
against a president shall be preferred by the chairperson of the board upon written information furnished to
him or her, and charges against a faculty member shall be preferred in writing by the president unless the
offense is committed in his or her presence.
(5) (a) President and faculty member performance and productivity shall be evaluated at least once every four
(4) years using a process approved by each board.
(b) Any preliminary discussions relating to the evaluation of the president by the board or between the
board and the president prior to the final evaluation report shall be conducted in closed session
pursuant to KRS 61.810(1)(f).
(c) The final performance and productivity evaluation report on the president shall be in writing,
discussed and adopted in an open meeting of the board and reflected in the minutes, and made
available to the public upon request.
(d) Failure to meet performance and productivity requirements may result in removal of a president or
faculty member regardless of status.
(e) The evaluation process shall be established by each board and provided to all faculty members by
January 1, 2026, to become effective July 1, 2026.
Section 20. KRS 164.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of trustees has full power to suspend or remove any of the officers, teachers, professors, or agents
that it is authorized to appoint, but no president, professor, or teacher shall be removed except for
incompetency, neglect of or refusal to perform his or her duty, immoral conduct, or failure to meet college or
university performance and productivity requirements as determined in accordance with subsection (2) of this
section. A president, professor, or teacher shall not be removed until after thirty (30) days' notice in writing,
stating the nature of the charges preferred, and after an opportunity has been given him or her to make defense
before the board by counsel or otherwise and to introduce testimony which shall be heard and determined by
the board. Officer, teacher, professor, or agent appointment and removal decisions may be delegated to the
president in accordance with policy adopted by the board of trustees.
(2) (a) President, teacher, and professor performance and productivity shall be evaluated at least once every
four (4) years using a process approved by the board.
(b) Any preliminary discussions relating to the evaluation of the president by the board or between the
board and the president prior to the final evaluation shall be conducted in closed session pursuant to
KRS 61.810(1)(f).
(c) The final performance and productivity evaluation report on the president shall be in writing,
discussed and adopted in an open meeting of the board and reflected in the minutes, and made
available to the public upon request.

CHAPTER 171 23
(d) Failure to meet performance and productivity requirements may result in removal of a president,
teacher, or professor regardless of status. The evaluation process shall be established by the board and
provided to all faculty members by January 1, 2026, to become effective July 1, 2026.
Section 21. KRS 164.830 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board of trustees of the University of Louisville shall constitute a body corporate, with the usual corporate
powers, and shall possess all the authorities, immunities, rights, privileges, and franchises usually attaching to
the governing bodies of Kentucky public higher educational institutions. A majority of the voting members of
the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Powers of the board shall include the
following:
(a) Appointment of a president, all faculty members, and other personnel and determination of the
compensation, duties, and official relations of each. No relative of a board of trustee member shall be
employed by the university. Faculty member and personnel appointment decisions may be delegated to
the president in accordance with policy adopted by the board of trustees;
(b) Suspension or removal of the president, officers, faculty, agents, or other personnel that it is authorized
to appoint, except that no president, professor, or teacher shall be removed except for incompetence,
neglect of or refusal to perform his or her duty, immoral conduct, or failure to meet college or
university performance and productivity requirements as determined in accordance with paragraph (c)
of this subsection. Any removal shall be made in accordance with procedures established by law for
state institutions. Officer, faculty, agent, or other personnel removal decisions may be delegated to the
president in accordance with policy adopted by the board of trustees;
(c) 1. Creation of a process requiring the evaluation of the performance and productivity of the
president, professors, and teachers at least once every four (4) years.
2. Any preliminary discussions relating to the evaluation of the president by the board or between
the board and the president prior to the final evaluation report shall be conducted in closed
session pursuant to KRS 61.810(1)(f).
3. The final performance and productivity evaluation of the president shall be in writing,
discussed and adopted in an open meeting of the board and reflected in the minutes, and made
available to the public upon request.
4. Failure to meet performance and productivity requirements may result in removal of a president,
professor, or teacher regardless of status.
5. The evaluation process shall be established by the board and provided to all faculty members by
January 1, 2026, to become effective July 1, 2026;
(d) Election of a chairperson, a vice chairperson to act in the absence or temporary disability of the
chairperson, and any other officers as it deems wise, including the annual election of a six (6) member
executive committee which shall have the powers that the board delegates to it and shall operate under
the rules the board shall establish under its authority to make bylaws, rules, and regulations consistent
with this chapter. The committee shall have one (1) member representing the students, faculty, and
nonteaching personnel with the group alternating each year. The initial appointment to the executive
committee after March 21, 2017, shall be a faculty member, to be followed by a student and a
nonteaching personnel, respectively;
(e) Receipt, retention, and administration, on behalf of the university, subject to the conditions attached, all
revenues accruing from endowments, appropriations, allotments, grants or bequests, and all types of
property;
(f) Requirement of reports from the president, officers, faculty, and employees as it deems necessary and
proper from time to time;
(g) Granting degrees to graduates of the university, prescription of conditions upon which postgraduate
honors may be obtained, and conferment of honorary degrees;
(h) The board shall periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its missions, goals, and
objectives to conform to the strategic agenda. Officers and officials shall be held accountable for the
status of the institution's progress; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(i) The board shall adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations for the governance of its members, officers, agents,
and employees, which shall reference the member removal and replacement provisions of KRS 63.080,
and the board shall enforce obedience to those bylaws, rules, and regulations.
(2) Board members shall receive no compensation for serving on the board, but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses for attending meetings and performing other official functions, consistent with the reimbursement
policy for state employees. Board members who reside outside the Commonwealth shall not be reimbursed for
out-of-state travel expenses.
(3) The provisions of KRS 164.030, 164.200, and 164.410, shall be applicable to the University of Louisville,
except where inconsistent with the purposes of KRS 164.810 to 164.870.
Section 22. KRS 164.131 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The government of the University of Kentucky is vested in a board of trustees appointed for a term set
by law pursuant to Section 23 of the Constitution of Kentucky.
(b) 1. All appointed and elected persons shall be required to attend and complete an orientation and
education program prescribed by the council under KRS 164.020(24), as a condition of their
service and eligibility for appointment or election to a second term.
2. Attendance at an orientation and education program required in subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph shall not constitute a meeting for the purposes of KRS 61.800 to 61.850 if official
action is not taken, regardless of how many board members are in attendance.
(c) The board shall periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its missions, goals, and
objectives to conform to the strategic agenda. Officers and officials shall be held accountable for the
status of the institution's progress.
(d) Board members may be removed by the Governor under the following circumstances:
1. For cause, pursuant to KRS 63.080(2); or
2. Pursuant to KRS 63.080(3) or (4).
(e) The board shall consist of sixteen (16) members appointed by the Governor, two (2) members of the
faculty of the University of Kentucky, one (1) member of the University of Kentucky nonteaching
personnel, and one (1) member of the student body of the University of Kentucky. The members
appointed by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate. The voting members of the
board shall select a chairperson annually.
(2) (a) The terms of the appointed members shall be for six (6) years and until their successors are appointed
and qualified, unless a member is removed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 63.080(2), (3), or (4),
except the initial appointments shall be as follows:
1. Two (2) members shall serve one (1) year terms;
2. Two (2) members shall serve two (2) year terms, one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the
university, selected from a list of three (3) names submitted by the alumni of the university
according to rules established by the board of trustees;
3. Three (3) members shall serve three (3) year terms;
4. Three (3) members shall serve four (4) year terms, one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the
university, selected as under subparagraph 2. of this subsection;
5. Three (3) members shall serve five (5) year terms; and
6. Three (3) members shall serve six (6) year terms, one (1) of whom shall be a graduate of the
university, selected as under subparagraph 2. of this subsection.
(b) 1. Three (3) of the appointments shall be graduates of the university and may include one (1)
graduate of the institution who resides outside the Commonwealth;
2. Three (3) shall be representative of agricultural interests; and
3. Ten (10) shall be other distinguished citizens representative of the learned professions and may
include one (1) who resides outside of Kentucky.

CHAPTER 171 25
(c) The Governor shall make the appointments so as to reflect proportional representation of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth based on the state's voter registration and the political
affiliation of each appointee as of December 31 of the year preceding the date of his or her appointment,
and to reflect no less than proportional representation of the minority racial composition of the
Commonwealth based on the total minority racial population using the most recent census or estimate
data from the United States Census Bureau. If the determination of proportional minority representation
does not result in a whole number of minority members, it shall be rounded up to the next whole
number. A particular political affiliation shall not be a prerequisite to appointment to the board
generally; however, if any person is appointed to the board that does not represent either of the two (2)
leading political parties of the Commonwealth, the proportional representation by political affiliation
requirement shall be determined and satisfied based on the total number of members on the board less
any members not affiliated with either of the two (2) leading political parties.
(d) Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for
the original appointments.
(3) The two (2) University of Kentucky faculty members shall be of the rank of assistant professor or above. They
shall be elected by secret ballot by all University of Kentucky faculty members of the rank of assistant
professor or above. Faculty members shall serve for terms of three (3) years and until their successors are
elected and qualified. Faculty members shall be eligible for reelection, but they shall be ineligible to continue
to serve as members of the board of trustees if they cease to be members of the faculty of the university.
Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for original
elections.
(4) The nonteaching personnel member shall be any full-time staff member, excluding the president, vice-
presidents, academic deans, and academic department chairpersons. The staff member shall represent all
nonteaching university employees, including but not limited to building facilities and clerical personnel. The
staff member shall be elected by secret ballot by the nonteaching employees. The staff member shall serve a
term of three (3) years and until a successor is elected and qualified. The staff member shall be eligible for
reelection, but a staff member who ceases being an employee of the university shall not be eligible to continue
to serve as a member of the board. Elections to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term and shall be held
in the same manner as provided for the original election.
(5) The student member shall serve a one (1) year term beginning on July 1 after being elected and sworn in as
student body president and ending on the following June 30. If the student member does not maintain the
position of student body president or the status of a full-time student at any time during that academic year, a
special election shall be held to select a full-time student member. The elected student member shall serve for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
(6) The number of student and employee trustees of the University of Kentucky elected to the board shall not
exceed four (4).
(7) Unless specifically approved by the board of trustees under the provisions of KRS 164.367, no member of the
administrative staff of the university shall be directly or indirectly interested in any contract with the university
for the sale of property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services, with exception of compensation to the two
(2) faculty members, and the one (1) nonteaching personnel member.
(8) New appointees of the board shall not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.
(9) The inability of the board to hold regular meetings, to elect a chairperson annually, to establish a quorum, to
adopt an annual budget, to set tuition rates, to conduct an annual evaluation of the president of the university,
or to carry out its primary function to periodically evaluate the institution's progress in implementing its
mission, goals, and objectives to conform to the strategic agenda shall be cause for the Governor to remove all
appointed members of the board and replace the entire appointed membership pursuant to KRS 63.080(4).
Section 23. The following KRS sections are repealed:
164.003 Legislative findings and goals for achievement by 2020.
164.004 Strategic Committee on Postsecondary Education.
164.0285 Definitions for KRS 164.0285 to 164.0288.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
164.0286 STEM Initiative Task Force -- Purpose -- Membership -- Steering committee oversight and coordination --
Administrative attachment -- Contracting -- Funding.
164.0287 Duties of STEM Initiative Task Force -- Strategic plan -- Business plan.
164.0288 Kentucky STEM Initiative fund.
164.033 Local P-16 councils.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.